Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-1212
Department of Health and Human Services; cases; case manager; employee of department; duties; referrals authorized.

For all cases in which a court has awarded a juvenile to the care of the Department of Health and Human Services according to subsection (1) of section 43-285 and for any noncourt and voluntary cases, the case manager shall be an employee of the department. Such case manager shall be responsible for and shall directly oversee: Case planning; service authorization; investigation of compliance; monitoring and evaluation of the care and services provided to children and families; and decisionmaking regarding the determination of visitation and the care, placement, medical services, psychiatric services, training, and expenditures on behalf of each juvenile under subsection (1) of section 43-285. Such case manager shall be responsible for decisionmaking and direct preparation regarding the proposed plan for the care, placement, services, and permanency of the juvenile filed with the court required under subsection (2) of section 43-285. The health and safety of the juvenile shall be the paramount concern in the proposed plan. When appropriate, the case manager may refer (1) families with a child, two years of age or younger, for evidence-based home visitation services as provided in the Family Home Visitation Act and (2) families with a child, three years of age or younger, to early intervention services as defined in section 43-2505.

Laws 2012, LB961, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB660, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB600, § 18;

Laws 2020, LB219, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB1173, § 18;

Laws 2026, LB903, § 1.
July 18, 2026